Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
466J

RADIOLOGIC
TECHNOLOGY

Section

466J-1 Definitions

466J-1.5, 1.6 Repealed

466J-2 Radiologic technology board; appointment;
duties

466J-3 Executive officer; other assistants

466J-4 Licenses required

466J-5 Radiographers, radiation therapists, and
nuclear

medicine technologists; qualifications and
licenses

466J-5.5 Continuing education requirement for
renewal

466J-6 Persons exempted

466J-7 Radiologic technology education programs

466J-8 Denial, revocation, or suspension of
license

466J-9 Violations of chapter; penalties

466J-10 Injunctive relief

Cross References

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Breast density mammography results; report and notification,
see §321-46.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next